Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-376
Applicability of sections.

The provisions of sections 23-373 to 23-377 shall not apply in any county unless the county board of such county shall have first adopted a comprehensive development plan as defined in section 23-114.02, nor until the county board of such county has duly adopted comprehensive and uniform platting and subdivision regulations governing the alignment of streets, maximum grade of streets and minimum area of lots.

Laws 1961, c. 94, § 5, p. 322;

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 18, p. 378.

Approval by county board of transfer of land from one school district to another was not required by sections 23-373 to 23-377, R.R.S.1943, where there was no evidence that the county board had adopted "comprehensive and uniform platting and subdivision regulations". Schilke v. School Dist. No. 107 of Saunders County, 207 Neb. 448, 299 N.W.2d 527 (1980).